New York, session 2025-2026, A7167.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 72-s to read as follows: 3 § 72-s. Childcare and dependent care reimbursement for volunteer 4 members of public bodies. 1. For purposes of this section, "public body" 5 shall have the same meaning as such term is defined in section one 6 hundred two of the public officers law. 7 2. Volunteer members of a public body shall be reimbursed for actual 8 childcare and dependent care expenses incurred during the performance of 9 the volunteer member's duties serving on such public body, including but 10 not limited to time spent attending regular or special meetings of such 11 public body. 12 3. Upon the discharge of the volunteer member's official duties, if 13 applicable, a volunteer member of a public body shall submit documenta- 14 tion of the costs of childcare or dependent care expenses incurred 15 during the performance of their duties to the appropriate public officer 16 or other person designated to receive documentation for financial 17 reimbursement or the municipality or political subdivision which over- 18 sees such public body or appoints its members. 19 § 2. Section 64 of the public officers law is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 § 64. Payment of expenses of public officers. Every public officer who 22 is not allowed any compensation for [his] their services shall be paid 23 [his] their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of 24 [his] their official duties, including childcare and dependent care 25 expenses pursuant to section seventy-two-s of the general municipal law. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11059-01-5